Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-364
Tax Commissioner; vacancy; removal by Governor.

In case of vacancy in the office of Tax Commissioner by death, resignation, or otherwise, the Governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next session of the Legislature, when the vacancy for the unexpired term shall be filled in the manner provided in section 77-363. The Tax Commissioner may be removed by the Governor, following a public hearing, if requested by the Tax Commissioner.

Laws 1921, c. 133, art. III, § 2, p. 548;

C.S.1922, § 5828;

C.S.1929, § 77-302;

R.S.1943, § 77-302;

Laws 1951, c. 258, § 2, p. 883;

Laws 1965, c. 459, § 16, p. 1460;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 77-302;

Laws 1980, LB 834, § 5.